Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1553XC (2) 91 da/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 468.12A Abstract. 1 An attorney or abstractor who prepares an abstract of title 2 for land located within an existing levee or drainage district 3 shall indicate that the land is part of such district. 4